Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.260

Corporate action by single and multiple voting groups.

(1) If the articles of incorporation or this title provide for voting on a corporate action by all shares entitled to vote thereon, voting together as a single voting group and do not provide for separate voting by any other voting group or groups with respect to that corporate action, that corporate action is approved when voted upon by that single voting group as provided in RCW 23B.07.250.

(2) If the articles of incorporation or this title provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a corporate action, that corporate action is approved only when voted upon by each of those voting groups as provided in RCW 23B.07.250.

[ 2009 c 189 s 19; 2003 c 35 s 2; 1989 c 165 s 74.]